ja: 食品・飲料 > 食品 > 野菜・果物 > 野菜・冷凍野菜: アラカチャ; アーティチョーク; アスパラガス; 豆類; ビーツ; ボリジ; ブロッコリー; ブロッコリーニ; 芽キャベツ; キャベツ; 食用サボテン; カルドン; ニンジン; カリフラワー; セロリ; 根セロリ; コーン; キュウリ; ナス; フェンネル（球根）; ゼンマイ; からし菜; カイラン; ニンニク; 根生姜; ゴボウ; 葉物野菜; わさび; ヒカマ; コールラビ; ネギ; レンコン; マランガ; きのこ; オクラ; 玉ネギ; 根パセリ; パースニップ; グリーンピース; ピーマン・唐辛子; ジャガイモ; 大根・ラディッシュ; ルバーブ; エシャロット; スプラウト; カボチャ・ウリ; サトウキビ; キクイモ; サツマイモ; コダチトマト; サトイモ; トマト; カブ・ルタバガ; 野菜ミックス; シログワイ; クレソン; ウィートグラス; ヤム; キャッサバ（根）
lt-LT: Maistas, gėrimai ir tabakas > Maisto prekės > Vaisiai ir daržovės > Šviežios ir šaldytos daržovės: Gelsvašaknės morkuolės; Artišokai; Šparagai; Pupelės; Burokėliai; Agurklės; Brokoliai; Brokoliniai kopūstai; Briuselio kopūstai; Kopūstai; Opuncijų lapai; Dygieji artišokai; Morkos; Žiediniai kopūstai; Salierai; Salierų šaknys; Kukurūzai; Agurkai; Baklažanai; Pankolių svogūnėliai; Paparčių ūgliai; Sareptiniai bastučiai; Kiniškieji brokoliai; Česnakai; Imbierų šaknys; Varnalėšų šaknys; Žalumynai; Krienų šaknys; Ropinės gumbapupės; Kaliaropės; Porai; Lotosų šaknys; Valgomosios kolokazijos šaknys; Grybai; Valgomoji ybiškė; Svogūnai; Petražolių šaknys; Pastarnokai; Žirniai; Paprikos; Bulvės; Ridikėliai; Rabarbarai; Valgomieji svogūnėliai; Daigai; Moliūgai; Cukranendrės; Topinambai; Saldžiosios bulvės; Tamarilai; Taro šaknys; Pomidorai; Ropės ir griežčiai; Daržovių mišiniai; Saldieji duoniai; Paprastieji rėžiukai; Kviečių želmenys; Jamsai; Jukos šaknys
nb: Mat, drikkevarer og tobakk > Matvarer > Frukt og grønnsaker > Frisk og frossen frukt: Arracachaer; Artisjokker; Asparges; Bønner; Beter; Borage; Brokkoli; Aspargesbrokkoli; Rosenkål; Kål; Kaktusblader; Artisjokk; Gulrøtter; Blomkål; Selleri; Sellerirøtter; Mais; Agurker; Auberginer; Fennikelpærer; Felehoder; Gai Choy; Gai Lan; Hvitløk; Ingefærrot; Goborot; Grønn salat; Pepperrot; Jicama; Kålrabi; Vårløk; Lotusrøtter; Malangaer; Sopper; Okra; Løk; Persillerot; Pastinakker; Erter; Paprika; Poteter; Reddiker; Rabarbra; Sjalottløk; Spirer; Squash og kalebass; Sukkerrør; Jordskokk; Søtpoteter; Tamarilloer; Tarorøtter; Tomater; Neper og rutabagas; Grønnsaksblandinger; Vannkastanjer; Brønnkarse; Hvetegress; Jams; Yukarot
pt-BR: Alimentos, bebidas e tabaco > Alimentos > Frutas e vegetais > Legumes frescos e congelados: Mandioquinha; Alcachofras; Aspargos; Feijões; Beterrabas; Borragem; Brócolis; Broccolini; Couves-de-bruxelas; Repolho; Folhas de cacto; Alcachofra-brava; Cenouras; Couve-flor; Aipo; Raízes de aipo; Milho; Pepinos; Berinjelas; Bulbos de funcho; Samambaias fiddlehead; Mostarda-castanha; Kai-lan; Alho; Raízes de gengibre; Raízes de bardana; Verduras; Raiz-forte; Jicamas; Couve-rábano; Alho-poró; Raíz de lótus; Malangas; Cogumelos; Quiabo; Cebolas; Raízes de salsa; Cherovia; Ervilhas; Pimentas; Batatas; Rabanetes; Ruibarbos; Chalotas; Brotos; Abóboras e cabaços; Cana de açúcar; Alcachofra-de-jerusalém; Batatas doces; Tamarilhos; Raiz de taro; Tomates; Nabos e nutabagas; Misturas de legumes; Castanha-d'água; Agrião; Grama de trigo; Inhame; Mandioca
ru: Продукты, напитки и табачные изделия > Пищевые продукты > Фрукты и овощи > Свежие и замороженные овощи: Арракача; Артишоки; Спаржа; Бобы; Свекла; Огуречная трава; Брокколи; Брокколини; Брюссельская капуста; Кочанная капуста; Листья кактуса; Испанские артишоки; Морковь; Цветная капуста; Сельдерей; Корни сельдерея; Кукуруза; Огурцы; Баклажаны; Луковицы фенхеля; Папоротник; Сарептская горчица; Китайская брокколи; Чеснок; Корень имбиря; Корень лопуха; Зелень; Корень хрена; Хикама; Кольраби; Лук-порей; Корень лотоса; Ксантосома; Грибы; Окра; Лук; Корень петрушки; Пастернак; Горох; Перец; Картофель; Редис; Ревень; Лук-шалот; Проростки; Тыква; Сахарный тростник; Топинамбур; Батат; Тамарилло; Корень таро; Помидоры; Репа и брюква; Овощные смеси; Водяные каштаны; Кресс-салат; Ростки пшеницы; Клубни ямса; Клубни маниока
hr-HR: Hrana, piće i duhan > Prehrambeni artikli > Voće i povrće > Svježe i smrznuto povrće: Arakača; Artičoke; Šparoga; Grah; Cikla; Boražina; Brokula; Brokula bimi; Prokulice; Kupus; Lišće kaktusa; Karda; Mrkva; Cvjetača; Celer; Korijen celera; Kukuruz; Krastavci; Patlidžani; Komorač; Mlada paprat; Smeđa gorušica; Kineski kelj; Češnjak; Korijen đumbira; Korijen čička; Zelenje; Korijen hrena; Jicama; Koraba; Poriluk; Korijen lotusa; Malanga; Gljive; Bamija; Luk; Korijen peršina; Pastrnjak; Grašak; Paprika; Krumpir; Rotkvice; Rabarbara; Ljutika; Klice; Tikvice i buče; Šećerna trska; Čičoka; Batat; Tamarilo; Taro korijen; Rajčica; Repa i rutabaga; Mješavine povrća; Vodeni kesteni; Potočarka; Pšenična trava; Jam; Korijen yuce
bg-BG: Храна, напитки и тютюневи изделия > Хранителни продукти > Плодове и зеленчуци > Пресни и замразени зеленчуци: Аракача; Артишок; Аспержи; Боб; Цвекло; Пореч; Броколи; Броколини; Брюкселско зеле; Зеле; Листа от кактус; Кардон; Моркови; Карфиол; Целина; Корени от целина; Царевица; Краставици; Патладжани; Резене; Глави от папрат; Гай Чой; Гай Лан; Чесън; Корен от джинджифил; Корен от репей; Салати и листни зеленчуци; Корен от хрян; Хикама; Алабаш; Праз; Корени от лотос; Маланга; Гъби; Бамя; Лук; Корени от магданоз; Пащърнак; Грах; Чушки; Картофи; Репички; Ревен; Шалот; Кълнове; Тиквички и кратунки; Захарна тръстика; Земна ябълка; Сладки картофи; Тамарило; Таро корен; Домати; Ряпа и брюква; Зеленчукови миксове; Водни кестени; Кресон; Житна трева; Ямс; Корен от Юка
es: Alimentación, bebida y tabaco > Alimentos > Frutas y verduras > Verduras frescas y congeladas: Arracachas; Alcachofas; Espárragos; Judías; Remolachas; Borrajas; Brócoli; Broccolini; Coles de Bruselas; Coles; Hojas de cactus; Cardos comestibles; Zanahorias; Coliflor; Apio; Apio nabo; Maíz; Pepinos; Berenjenas; Bulbos de hinojo; Brotes de helecho; Gai choy; Gai lan; Ajo; Jengibre; Raíz de Bardana; Verduras de hoja; Raíz de rábano picante; Jícama; Colirrábano; Puerros; Raíz de loto; Malangas; Setas; Ocra; Cebollas; Raíz de perejil; Chirivías; Guisantes; Pimientos; Patatas; Rábanos; Ruibarbo; Chalotas; Brotes; Calabazas y calabacines; Caña de azúcar; Tupinambo; Boniatos; Tamarillos; Raíz de taro; Tomates; Nabos y colinabos; Combinaciones de verduras; Castaña de agua; Berro; Hierba de trigo; Ñames; Yucas
da: Fødevarer, drikkevarer og tobak > Fødevarer > Frugt og grøntsager > Friske og frosne grøntsager: Arracacha; Artiskokker; Asparges; Bønner; Beder; Hjulkrone; Broccoli; Broccolini; Rosenkål; Kål; Kaktusblade; Kardon; Gulerødder; Blomkål; Bladselleri; Rodselleri; Majs; Agurker; Aubergine; Fennikel; Fiddlehead-bregne; Gai Choy-salat; Gai Lan-salat; Hvidløg; Ingefærrod; Burrerod; Grøntsager; Peberrod; Mexicanske yamsbønner; Kålrabi; Porrer; Lotusrod; Malangafrugt; Champignon; Okra; Løg; Persillerod; Pastinak; Ærter; Peberfrugt; Kartofler; Radiser; Rabarber; Skalotteløg; Spirer; Squash og flaskegræskar; Sukkerrør; Jordskokker; Søde kartofler; Trætomat; Taro-rodfrugt; Tomater; Majroer og kålrabi; Grøntsagsblandinger; Vandkastanjer; Brøndkarse; Hvedegræs; Yamsrødder; Yucca-rodfrugt
nl: Eten, drinken en tabak > Voedselitems > Fruit en groente > Verse en diepvriesgroenten: Casaves; Artisjokken; Asperges; Bonen; Bieten; Borage; Broccoli; Bimi; Spruitjes; Kool; Cactusblad; Kardoen; Wortelen; Bloemkool; Selderij; Selderijstengels; Mais; Komkommers; Aubergines; Venkelknollen; Varenkrullen; Gai choy; Chinese broccoli; Knoflook; Gember; Gobowortel; Mesclun; Mierikswortel; Jicama; Koolrabi; Prei; Lotuswortel; Malanga; Paddenstoelen; Okra; Uien; Peterseliewortel; Pastinaken; Erwten; Paprika's; Aardappelen; Radijs; Rabarber; Sjalotjes; Kiemgroenten; Pompoenen en kalebassen; Suikerriet; Aardpeer; Zoete aardappel; Boomtomaat; Tarowortel; Tomaten; Knolraap en koolraap; Groentemixen; Waterkastanjes; Waterkers; Tarwegras; Yams; Yuca
hu: Élelmiszerek, italok és dohányáru > Élelmiszertételek > Gyümölcsök és Zöldségek > Friss és fagyasztott zöldségek: Arracachák; Articsókák; Spárgák; Babok; Céklák; Borágó; Brokkoli; Brokkolini; Kelbimbók; Káposzta; Kaktuszlevelek; Kárdi; Sárgarépák; Karfiol; Zeller; Zellergyökerek; Kukorica; Uborkák; Padlizsánok; Édesköményhagymák; Hegedűfej-páfrányok; Szareptai mustár; Kínai brokkoli; Fokhagyma; Gyömbérgyökér; Gobogyökér; Zöldek; Tormagyökér; Jicama; Karalábé; Póréhagyma; Lótuszgyökerek; Tarók; Gombák; Okra; Hagymák; Petrezselyemgyökerek; Pasztinák; Borsók; Paprikák; Burgonyák; Retek; Rebarbara; Mogyoróhagyma; Csírák; Tökök; Cukornád; Csicsókák; Édesburgonya; Paradicsomfák; Tarogyökér; Paradicsomok; Tarlórépa és karórépa; Növényi keverékek; Vízi gesztenye; Vízitorma; Búzafű; Jamgyökér; Manióka
pt-PT: Comida, bebidas e tabaco > Artigos alimentares > Frutas e vegetais > Vegetais frescos e congelados: Arracachas; Alcachofras; Espargos; Feijões; Beterrabas; Borragem; Brócolos; Bimis; Couves de Bruxelas; Couve; Folhas de cato; Cardo; Cenouras; Couve-flor; Aipo; Raiz de aipo; Milho; Pepinos; Beringelas; Cebolas de funcho; Rebentos de samambaia; Couve Gai Choy; Couve Gai Lan; Alho; Raiz de gengibre; Raiz de bardana; Vegetais de folhas verdes; Raiz de rábano; Jícama; Couve-rábano; Alho-francês; Raiz de lótus; Malangas; Cogumelos; Quiabos; Alhos; Raiz de salsa; Pastinaca; Ervilhas; Pimentos; Batatas; Rabanetes; Ruibarbo; Chalotas; Rebentos; Aboborinhas e pepinos; Cana-do-açúcar; Topinambo; Batata-doce; Tamarillos; Raiz de taro; Tomates; Nabos e couve-nabo; Misturas de vegetais; Castanha-d'água; Agrião; Erva de trigo; Inhame; Raiz de iúca
it: Cibo, bevande e tabacco > Alimenti > Frutta e verdura > Verdure fresche e congelate: Arracacha; Carciofi; Asparagi; Fagioli; Barbabietole; Borragine; Broccoli; Broccolini; Cavolini di Bruxelles; Cavolo; Foglie di cactus; Cardi; Carote; Cavolfiore; Sedano; Radici di sedano; Mais; Cetrioli; Melanzane; Finocchi; Germogli di felce; Senape bruna; Broccoli cinesi; Aglio; Radici di zenzero; Radici di arctium; Verdure a foglia; Radice di rafano; Patate messicane; Cavolo rapa; Porri; Radici di loto; Malanga; Funghi; Gombo; Cipolle; Radici di prezzemolo; Pastinaca; Piselli; Peperoni; Patate; Ravanelli; Rabarbaro; Scalogno; Germogli; Zucche e meloni; Canna da zucchero; Topinambur; Patate dolci; Tamarillo; Radice di colocasia; Pomodori; Rape e cavoli navoni; Mix di verdure; Castagne cinesi; Crescione; Erba di grano; Yam; Radice di yucca
el: Τρόφιμα, ποτά & προϊόντα καπνού > Είδη διατροφής > Φρούτα & λαχανικά > Φρέσκα & κατεψυγμένα λαχανικά: Αρακάχας; Αγκινάρες; Σπαράγγια; Φασόλια; Παντζάρια; Μπουράντζα; Μπρόκολο; Μπροκολίνι; Λαχανάκια Βρυξελλών; Λάχανο; Φύλλα κάκτου; Αγριοαγκινάρα; Καρότα; Κουνουπίδι; Σέλινο; Ρίζες σέλινου; Καλαμπόκι; Αγγούρια; Μελιτζάνες; Βολβοί μάραθου; Βλαστοί φτέρης; Γκάι τσόι; Γκάι λαν; Σκόρδο; Ρίζα τζίντζερ; Ρίζα γκο; Πράσινα λαχανικά; Ρίζα ραπανιού; Τζικάμα; Κολράμπι; Πράσα; Ρίζες λωτού; Μαλάγκα; Μανιτάρια; Μπάμιες; Κρεμμύδια; Ρίζες μαϊντανού; Παστινάκι; Αρακάς; Πιπεριές; Πατάτες; Ραπανάκια; Ραβέντι; Κρεμμύδια εσαλότ; Βλαστοί; Κολοκύθια διαφόρων ποικιλιών; Ζαχαροκάλαμο; Σάντσοουκ; Γλυκοπατάτες; Ταμαρίλο; Ρίζα τάρο; Ντομάτες; Γογγύλια & γουλιά; Μείγματα λαχανικών; Κινέζικα νεροκάστανα; Νεροκάρδαμο; Σιταρόχορτο; Γιαμ; Ρίζα γιούκα
cs: Jídlo, pití a tabák > Potraviny > Ovoce a zelenina > Čerstvá a mražená zelenina: Arakača; Artičoky; Chřest; Fazole; Řepa; Brutnák; Brokolice; Výhonková brokolice; Růžičková kapusta; Zelí; Kaktusové listy; Artyčok kardový; Mrkev; Květák; Řapíkatý celer; Celer; Kukuřice; Okurky; Lilek; Fenyklové hlízy; Kapradinové výhonky; Asijská hořčice; Kai lan – čínská brokolice; Česnek; Zázvor; Kořen gobo; Listová zelenina; Křen; Jicama; Kedluben; Pórek; Lotosový kořen; Xantosóma; Houby; Okra; Cibule; Petržel; Pastinák; Hrášek; Papriky; Brambory; Ředkev; Rebarbora; Šalotka; Výhonky; Dýně a tykve; Cukrová třtina; Topinambur; Sladké brambory; Tamarilo; Kořen taro; Rajčata; Tuřín a vodnice; Zeleninové směsi; Vodní kaštany; Potočnice; Pšeničná tráva; Jamy; Kořen juka
zh-TW: 食物、飲料和菸草 > 食品 > 蔬果 > 新鮮/冷凍蔬菜: 白薯; 朝鮮薊; 蘆筍; 豆類; 甜菜; 琉璃苣; 綠花椰; 青花筍; 抱子甘藍; 高麗菜; 仙人掌葉; 刺苞菜薊; 胡蘿蔔; 花椰菜; 西洋芹; 芹菜根; 玉米; 小黃瓜; 茄; 球莖茴香; 蕨菜; 芥菜; 芥藍; 大蒜; 老薑; 牛蒡根; 綠色蔬菜; 辣根; 豆薯; 大頭菜; 韭蔥; 蓮藕; 黃肉芋; 菇類; 秋葵; 洋蔥; 歐芹根; 防風草; 豌豆; 胡椒; 馬鈴薯; 蘿蔔; 大黃; 紅蔥頭; 芽菜; 南瓜/葫蘆; 甘蔗; 菊芋; 番薯; 樹番茄; 野芋根; 蕃茄; 蕪菁/蕪菁甘藍; 什錦蔬菜; 菱角; 西洋菜; 麥草; 山藥; 絲蘭根
fi: Ruoka, juoma ja tupakkatuotteet > Ruokatuotteet > Hedelmät ja kasvikset > Tuoreet ja pakastetut kasvikset: Perunpalsternakat; Artisokat; Parsat; Pavut; Punajuuret; Rohtopurasruoho; Parsakaali; Varsiparsakaali; Ruusukaali; Kaali; Kaktuksenlehdet; Isoartisokka; Porkkanat; Kukkakaali; Selleri; Mukulaselleri; Maissi; Kurkku; Munakoisot; Fenkoli; Viulunkierukat; Gai choy; Kai lan; Valkosipuli; Inkivääri; Takiaisenjuuri; Lehtivihannekset; Piparjuuri; Pikkujamssipapu; Kyssäkaali; Purjot; Lootusjuuret; Taarot; Sienet; Okra; Sipulit; Juuripersiljat; Palsternakat; Herneet; Paprikat; Perunat; Retiisit; Raparperi; Salottisipulit; Idut; Kurpitsat; Sokeriruoko; Maa-artisokat; Bataatit; Tamarillot; Taro; Tomaatit; Nauriit ja lantut; Kasvissekoitukset; Vesikastanja; Vesikrassi; Vehnänoras; Jamssi; Maniokki
fr: Alimentation, boissons et tabac > Aliments > Fruits et légumes > Légumes frais et surgelés: Arracachas; Artichauts; Asperges; Haricots; Betteraves; Bourrache; Brocoli; Broccolini; Choux de Bruxelles; Chou; Feuilles de cactus; Cardon; Carottes; Chou-fleur; Céleri; Racines de céleri; Maïs; Concombres; Aubergines; Bulbes de fenouil; Crosse de fougère; Moutarde brune; Brocoli chinois; Ail; Racines de gingembre; Racines de bardane; Légumes-feuilles; Racines de raifort; Pois patates; Chou-rave; Poireaux; Racines de lotus; Malangas; Champignons; Gombo; Oignons; Racines de persil; Panais; Pois; Piments; Pommes de terre; Radis; Rhubarbe; Échalotes; Germes de légumes; Courges et gourdes; Canne à sucre; Topinambours; Patates douces; Tamarillos; Racines de taro; Tomates; Raves et rutabagas; Mélanges de légumes; Châtaignes d’eau; Cresson de fontaine; Herbe de blé; Ignames; Racines de yucca
sl-SI: Hrana, pijača in tobak > Prehrambeni izdelki > Sadje in zelenjava > Sveža in zamrznjena zelenjava: Arakača; Artičoke; Šparglji; Fižol; Pesa; Boraga; Brokoli; Mlad brokoli; Brstični ohrovt; Zelje; Listi kaktusa; Artičoka; Korenje; Cvetača; Zelena; Koreni zelene; Koruza; Kumare; Jajčevci; Komarček; Poganjki praproti; Kitajsko gorčično zelje; Kitajski brokoli; Česen; Ingverjeva korenina; Repinec; Zelena listnata zelenjava; Hrenova korenina; Hikama; Koleraba; Por; Koreni lotosa; Malanga; Gobe; Okra; Čebula; Peteršilj; Pastinak; Grah; Paprike; Krompir; Redkvice; Rabarbara; Šalotka; Kalčki; Buče in okrasne buče; Sladkorni trs; Topinambur; Sladki krompir; Tamarillo; Taro; Paradižnik; Repa in koleraba; Mešanice zelenjave; Vodni kostanj; Vodna kreša; Pšenična trava; Jam; Korenina juke
sv: Mat, dryck och tobak > Livsmedel > Frukter och grönsaker > Färska och frysta grönsaker: Arrachaca; Kronärtskockor; Sparris; Bönor; Betor; Gurkört; Broccoli; Broccolini; Brysselkål; Kål; Kaktusblad; Kardon; Morötter; Blomkål; Selleri; Sellerirötter; Majs; Gurkor; Auberginer; Fänkålsstjälkar; Ormbunksskott; Gai choy; Gai lan; Vitlök; Ingefärsrot; Kardborrerot; Bladgrönsaker; Pepparrot; Jicama; Kålrabbi; Purjolök; Lotusrötter; Malanga; Svampar; Okra; Lök; Persiljerötter; Palsternackor; Ärter; Paprika; Potatis; Rädisor; Rabarber; Schalottenlök; Groddar; Squash och kalebasser; Sockerrör; Jordärtskocka; Sötpotatis; Tamarillo; Tarorot; Tomat; Rovor och kålrötter; Grönsaksblandningar; Vattenkastanjer; Vattenkrasse; Vetegräs; Jamsrot; sötpotatis; Maniok
vi: Thực phẩm, đồ uống và thuốc lá > Hàng thực phẩm > Trái cây và rau > Rau củ tươi và đông lạnh: Củ đót; Atisô; Măng tây; Đậu; Củ cải đường; Cây lưu ly; Cây bông cải xanh; Bông cải xanh baby; Cải mầm brussel; Cải bắp; Lá xương rồng; Rau ca-đông; Cà rốt; Súp lơ; Cần tây; Rễ cần tây; Ngô; Dưa chuột; Cà tím; Củ thì là; Dương xỉ đầu violin; Cải đắng; Cải làn; Tỏi; Củ gừng; Củ ngưu bàng; Rau lá xanh; Củ cải ngựa; Củ đậu; Su hào; Tỏi tây; Củ sen; Khoai môn; Nấm; Mướp tây; Củ hành; Rễ mùi tây; Củ cải vàng; Đậu Hà Lan; Ớt chuông; Khoai tây; Củ cải cay; Đại hoàng; Hẹ tây; Rau mầm; Rau quả bí; Mía; Củ hoa hướng dương Bắc Mỹ; Khoai lang; Cà Mỹ; Củ khoai sọ; Cà chua; Củ cải; Rau trộn; Củ năng; Cải xoong; Cỏ lúa mì; Củ từ; Củ yuca
ko: 식품/음료/담배 > 식품 > 과일/야채 > 신선/냉동 채소: 아라카차; 아티초크; 아스파라거스; 콩; 비트; 보리지; 브로콜리; 브로콜리니; 방울다다기양배추; 양배추; 선인장 잎; 카르둔; 당근; 콜리플라워; 셀러리; 셀러리액; 옥수수; 오이; 가지; 회향; 고비; 가이초이; 가이란; 마늘; 생강; 우엉; 녹황색 채소; 서양고추냉이; 히카마; 콜라비; 리크; 연근; 말랑가; 버섯; 오크라; 양파; 뿌리파슬리; 파스닙; 완두콩; 고추; 감자; 무; 루바브; 샬롯; 새싹류; 호박/박; 사탕수수; 뚱딴지; 고구마; 타마릴로; 타로; 토마토; 순무/스웨덴 순무; 모둠야채; 마름; 미나리; 밀싹; 참마; 유카
th: อาหาร เครื่องดื่ม และยาสูบ > รายการอาหาร > ผลไม้และผัก > ผักสดและแช่แข็ง: เอราคาช่า; อาร์ติโชก; หน่อไม้ฝรั่ง; ถั่ว; บีท; โบราจ; บรอกโคลี; บรอกโคลินี; กะหล่ำดาว; กะหล่ำปี; ใบแคคตัส; คาร์ดูน; แครอท; กะหล่ำดอก; ขึ้นฉ่ายฝรั่ง; หัวคึ่นช่ายฝรั่ง; ข้าวโพด; แตงกวา; มะเขือยาว; หัวผักชีล้อม; ใบอ่อนของเฟิร์น; ไกชอย; คะน้า; กระเทียม; ขิง; โกโบ; ผักใบเขียว; ฮอสแรดิช; มันแกว; กะหล่ำปลีชนิดหนึ่ง; ต้นหอม; รากบัว; มาลังกา; เห็ด; กระเจี๊ยบ; หัวหอม; รากผักชีฝรั่ง; พาซนิพ; ถั่วลันเตา; พืชจำพวกพริกไทย; มันฝรั่ง; แรดิช; รูบาร์บ; หอมแดง; ถั่วงอก; ฟักและบวบ; อ้อย; ซันโช้ก; มันเทศ; ทามาริลโล่; เผือก; มะเขือเทศ; หัวผักกาดและหัวกะหล่ำ; ผักรวม; แห้ว; ผักสลัดน้ำ; วีทกราส; มัน; รากยูคา
tr: Yiyecek, İçecekler ve Tütün Mamülleri > Yiyecek Çeşitleri > Meyve ve Sebzeler > Taze ve Dondurulmuş Sebzeler: Arracacha; Enginar; Kuşkonmaz; Fasulye; Pancar; Hodan; Brokoli; Brokolini; Brüksel Lahanası; Lahana; Kaktüs Yaprağı; Kenger Otu; Havuç; Karnabahar; Kereviz; Kereviz Kökleri; Mısır; Salatalık; Patlıcan; Rezene Soğanı; Eğrelti Otu Filizleri; Gai Choy; Gai Lan; Sarımsak; Zencefil Kökü; Dulavratotu Kökü; Yeşillik; Bayır Turpu Kökü; Meksika Şalgamı; Yer Lahanası; Pırasa; Nilüfer Kökleri; Malanga; Mantar; Bamya; Soğan; Maydanoz Kökleri; Yabani Havuç; Bezelye; Biberler; Patates; Kırmızı Turp; Ravent; Arpacık Soğanı; Lahanası; Kabaklar ve Su Kabakları; Şeker Kamışı; Yer Elması; Tatlı Patates; Ağaç Domatesi; Kulkas Kökü; Domates; Şalgamlar ve Sarı Şalgamlar; Sebze Karışımları; Su Kestanesi; Su Teresi; Buğday Çimi; Yamlar; Manyok Kökü
zh-CN: 饮食/烟酒 > 食品 > 蔬菜/水果 > 新鲜/冷冻蔬菜: 秘鲁胡萝卜; 洋蓟; 芦笋; 豆子; 甜菜; 琉璃苣; 西兰花; 西兰苔; 抱子甘蓝; 卷心菜; 仙人掌叶子; 刺菜蓟; 胡萝卜; 花椰菜; 芹菜; 芹菜根; 玉米; 黄瓜; 茄子; 茴香球茎; 蕨菜; 芥菜; 芥蓝; 大蒜; 姜; 牛蒡根; 绿叶蔬菜; 辣根; 豆薯; 球茎甘蓝; 韭菜; 莲藕; 黄肉芋; 蘑菇; 秋葵; 洋葱; 荷兰芹根/欧芹根/香芹根; 欧洲萝卜; 豌豆; 辣椒; 土豆; 水萝卜; 食用大黄/食用大黄叶柄; 毛葱; 豆芽菜; 南瓜与葫芦; 甘蔗; 菊芋; 红薯; 树番茄; 芋头根; 番茄; 红萝卜/芜菁甘蓝; 综合蔬菜; 荸荠; 豆瓣菜/西洋菜; 小麦草; 山药/芋; 木薯
ro-RO: Alimente, băuturi și tutun > Produse alimentare > Fructe și legume > Legume proaspete și congelate: Arracacha; Anghinare; Sparanghel; Fasole; Sfeclă roșie; Borage; Broccoli; Broccolini; Varză de Bruxelles; Varză; Frunze de cactus; Cardon; Morcovi; Conopidă; Țelină; Țelină rădăcină; Porumb; Castraveți; Vinete; Fenicul; Ferigi comestibile; Gai Choy; Gai Lan; Usturoi; Rădăcină de ghimbir; Rădăcină de gobo; Plante cu frunze verzi; Hrean; Jicama; Gulie; Praz; Rădăcini de lotus; Malanga; Ciuperci; Bame; Ceapă; Rădăcini de pătrunjel; Păstârnac; Mazăre; Ardei; Cartofi; Ridichi; Rubarbă; Eșalotă; Germeni; Dovleac; Trestie de zahăr; Topinambur; Cartofi dulci; Tamarillo; Rădăcini de taro; Roșii; Napi și rutabaga; Amestecuri de legume; Castane de apă; Năsturel; Germeni de grâu; Ignamă; Rădăcină de yucca
de: Nahrungsmittel, Getränke & Tabak > Lebensmittel > Obst & Gemüse > Frisches & Tiefgefrorenes Gemüse: Arakachas; Artischocken; Spargel; Bohnen; Rüben; Borretsch; Brokkoli; Spargelbrokkoli; Rosenkohl; Kohl; Kaktusblätter; Spanische Artischocken; Möhren; Blumenkohl; Sellerie; Sellerieknollen; Mais; Gurken; Auberginen; Fenchelknollen; Farnspitzen; Rutenkohl; Chinesischer Brokkoli; Knoblauch; Ingwer; Gobo-Wurzel; Blattgemüse; Rettich; Yambohnen; Kohlrabi; Porree; Lotoswurzel; Tannias; Pilze; Okra; Zwiebeln; Petersilienwurzeln; Pastinaken; Erbsen; Paprikaschoten; Kartoffeln; Radieschen; Rhabarber; Schalotten; Sprossen; Kürbisse; Zuckerrohr; Topinambur; Süßkartoffeln; Tamarillos; Tarowurzeln; Tomaten; Steckrüben & Kohlrüben; Gemüsemischungen; Wasserkastanien; Wasserkresse; Weizengras; Yams; Maniok
sk-SK: Potraviny, nápoje a tabakové výrobky > Potraviny > Ovocie a zelenina > Čerstvá a mrazená zelenina: Arracacha; Artičoky; Špargľa; Fazuľa; Cvikla; Borák lekársky; Brokolica; Baby brokolica; Ružičkový kel; Kapusta; Kaktusové listy; Artyčok kardový; Mrkva; Karfiol; Zeler; Korene zeleru; Kukurica; Uhorky; Baklažány; Feniklové cibuľky; Výhonky paprade; Gai Choy; Gai Lan; Cesnak; Koreň zázvoru; Koreň lopúcha (gobo); Listová zelenina; Koreň chrenu; Jicama; Kaleráb; Pór; Lotosový koreň; Malanga; Huby; Okra; Cibuľa; Koreň petržlenu; Paštrnák; Hrach; Paprika; Zemiaky; Reďkovky; Rebarbora; Šalotka; Klíčky; Tekvice; Cukrová trstina; Slnečnica hľuznatá; Sladké zemiaky; Tamarillo; Koreň taro; Paradajky; Repa a kvaka; Zeleninové zmesi; Gaštan vodný; Žerucha; Pšeničná tráva; Yams; Koreň yuca
en: Food, Beverages & Tobacco > Food Items > Fruits & Vegetables > Fresh & Frozen Vegetables: Arracachas; Artichokes; Asparagus; Beans; Beets; Borage; Broccoli; Broccolini; Brussel Sprouts; Cabbage; Cactus Leaves; Cardoon; Carrots; Cauliflower; Celery; Celery Roots; Corn; Cucumbers; Eggplants; Fennel Bulbs; Fiddlehead Ferns; Gai Choy; Gai Lan; Garlic; Ginger Root; Gobo Root; Greens; Horseradish Root; Jicama; Kohlrabi; Leeks; Lotus Roots; Malangas; Mushrooms; Okra; Onions; Parsley Roots; Parsnips; Peas; Peppers; Potatoes; Radishes; Rhubarb; Shallots; Sprouts; Squashes & Gourds; Sugar Cane; Sunchokes; Sweet Potatoes; Tamarillos; Taro Root; Tomatoes; Turnips & Rutabagas; Vegetable Mixes; Water Chestnuts; Watercress; Wheatgrass; Yams; Yuca Root
pl: Żywność, napoje i tytoń > Żywność > Owoce i warzywa > Świeże i mrożone warzywa: Arracacha; Karczochy; Szparagi; Fasolki; Buraki; Ogórecznik; Brokuł; Brokuł gałązkowy; Brukselki; Kapusty; Liście kaktusa; Karczoch hiszpański; Marchewki; Kalafior; Seler; Korzenie selera; Kukurydza; Ogórki; Bakłażany; Koper włoski; Pędy paproci; Kapusta sitowata; Gai Lan; Czosnek; Korzenie imbiru; Korzenie łopianu; Warzywa liściaste; Korzenie chrzanu; Kłębian kątowaty; Kalarepy; Pory; Korzenie lotusa; Malanga; Grzyby; Okra; Cebule; Korzenie pietruszki; Pasternaki; Groszek; Papryki; Ziemniaki; Rzodkiewki; Rabarbar; Szalotki; Kiełki; Dynie, cukinie i kabaczki; Trzcina cukrowa; Topinambur; Słodkie ziemniaki; Cyfomandra; Kolokazja; Pomidory; Rzepa i brukiew; Mieszanki warzywne; Kasztany wodne; Rukiew wodna; Trawa pszeniczna; Jamy; Korzenie juki